California statutes. Public Resources Code
(2) An initial study identifies potentially significant effects on the environment, but: (A) revisions in the project plans or proposals made by, or agreed to by, the applicant before the proposed negative declaration and initial study are released for public review would avoid the effects or mitigate the effects to a point where clearly no significant effect on the environment would occur; and (B) there is no substantial evidence, in light of the whole record before the
 lead agency, that the project, as revised, may have a significant effect on the environment.

(d) If there is substantial evidence, in light of the whole record before the lead agency, that the project may have a significant effect on the environment, an environmental impact report shall be prepared.

(e) (1) For purposes of this section and this division, substantial evidence includes fact, a reasonable assumption predicated upon fact, or expert opinion supported by fact.

(2) Substantial evidence is not argument, speculation, unsubstantiated opinion or narrative, evidence that is clearly inaccurate or erroneous, or evidence of social or economic impacts that do not contribute to, or are not caused by, physical
 impacts on the environment.

(f) As a result of the public review process for a mitigated negative declaration, including administrative decisions and public hearings, the lead agency may conclude that certain mitigation measures identified pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) are infeasible or otherwise undesirable. In those circumstances, the lead agency, before approving the project, may delete those mitigation measures and substitute for them other mitigation measures that the lead agency finds, after holding a public hearing on the matter, are equivalent or more effective in mitigating significant effects on the environment to a less than significant level and that do not cause any potentially significant effect on the environment. If those new mitigation measures are made conditions of project approval or are otherwise
 made part of the project approval, the deletion of the former measures and the substitution of the new mitigation measures shall not constitute an action or circumstance requiring recirculation of the mitigated negative declaration.

(g) This section does not preclude a project applicant or any other person from challenging, in an administrative or judicial proceeding, the legality of a condition of project approval imposed by the lead agency. If, however, any condition of project approval set aside by either an administrative body or court was necessary to avoid or lessen the likelihood of the occurrence of a significant effect on the environment, the lead agency’s approval of the negative declaration and project shall be invalid and a new environmental review process shall be conducted before the project can be reapproved,
 unless the lead agency substitutes a new condition that the lead agency finds, after holding a public hearing on the matter, is equivalent to, or more effective in, lessening or avoiding significant effects on the environment and that does not cause any potentially significant effect on the environment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 106, Sec. 12.   (AB 149)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.01.

This division shall not apply to any activity or approval necessary for the reopening and operation of the California Men’s Colony West Facility in San Luis Obispo County.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 958, Sec. 6.5.   Effective September 20, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.02.

This division shall not apply to any activity or approval necessary for or incidental to planning, design, site acquisition, construction, operation, or maintenance of the new prison facility at or in the vicinity of Corcoran in Kings County as authorized by the act that enacted this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 931, Sec. 3.   Effective September 25, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.03.

This division shall not apply to any activity or approval necessary for or incidental to the location, development, construction, operation, or maintenance of the prison in the County of Kings, authorized by Section 9 of Chapter 958 of the Statutes of 1983, as amended, and of the prison in the County of Amador (Ione), authorized by Chapter 957 of the Statutes of 1983, as amended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 931, Sec. 4.   Effective September 25, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.04.

(a) Notwithstanding paragraph (10) of subdivision (b) of Section 21080, this division applies to a project for the institution of passenger rail service on a line paralleling State Highway 29 and running from Rocktram to Krug in the Napa Valley. With respect to that project, and for the purposes of this division, the Public Utilities Commission is the lead agency.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to abrogate the decision of the California Supreme Court “that Section 21080, subdivision (b)(11), exempts Wine Train’s institution of passenger service on the Rocktram-Krug line from the requirements of CEQA” in Napa Valley Wine Train, Inc. v. Public Utilities Com., 50 Cal. 3d 370.

(c) Nothing in this section is intended to affect or apply to, or to confer jurisdiction upon the Public Utilities Commission with respect to, any other project involving rail service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 91, Sec. 142.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.05.

This division does not apply to a project by a public agency to lease or purchase the rail right-of-way used for the San Francisco Peninsula commute service between San Francisco and San Jose, together with all branch and spur lines, including the Dumbarton and Vasona lines.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1283, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.07.

This division shall not apply to any activity or approval necessary for or incidental to planning, design, site acquisition, construction, operation, or maintenance of the new prison facilities located in any of the following places:

(a) The County of Riverside.

(b) The County of Del Norte.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 933, Sec. 2.6.   Effective September 25, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.085.

(a) This division does not apply to a rezoning that implements the schedule of actions contained in an approved housing element pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 65583 of the Government Code.

(b) (1) Subdivision (a) does not apply to either of the following:

(A) A rezoning that would allow for the construction of a distribution center or for oil and gas infrastructure.

(B) A rezoning that would allow for construction to occur within the boundaries of any natural and protected lands as defined pursuant to Section
 21067.5.

(2) (A) (i) Subdivision (a) applies to a rezoning that contains within its boundaries any natural and protected lands as defined pursuant to Section 21067.5 if those natural and protected lands are excluded from the rezoning.

(ii) The definition of “natural and protected lands” described in clause (i) does not include the lands described in subdivision (p) of Section 21067.5.

(B) The rezoning of any parcel or portions of a parcel that is excluded from a rezoning under this paragraph shall be a separate project that is subject to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 24, Sec. 6.   (SB 131)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.09.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Public higher education” has the same meaning as specified in Section 66010 of the Education Code.

(2) “Long-range development plan” means a physical development and land use plan to meet the academic and institutional objectives for a particular campus or medical center of public higher education.

(b) The selection of a
 location for a particular campus and the approval of a long-range development plan are subject to this division and require the preparation of an environmental impact report.

(c) The approval of a project on a particular campus or medical center of public higher education is subject to this division and may be addressed, subject to the other provisions of this division, in a tiered environmental analysis based upon a long-range development plan environmental impact report.

(d) Compliance with this section satisfies the obligations of public higher education pursuant to this division to consider the environmental impact of academic and campus population plans as they affect campuses or medical centers, provided that any such plans shall become effective for a campus or medical center only after the environmental effects of those plans have been analyzed as required by this division in a long-range development plan environmental impact report or tiered analysis based upon that environmental impact report for that campus or medical center, and addressed as required by this division. Enrollment or changes in enrollment, by themselves, do not constitute a project as defined in Section 21065.

(e) (1) If a court determines that increases in campus population exceed the projections adopted in the most recent long-range development plan and analyzed in the supporting environmental impact report, and those increases result in significant environmental
 impacts, the court may order the campus or medical center to prepare a new, supplemental, or subsequent environmental impact report. Only if a new, supplemental, or subsequent environmental impact report has not been certified within 18 months of that order, the court may, pursuant to Sections 525 and 526 of the Code of Civil Procedure, enjoin increases in campus population that exceed the projections adopted in the most recent long-range development plan and analyzed in the supporting environmental impact report.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, any injunction or judgment in effect as of the effective date of this subdivision suspending or otherwise affecting enrollment shall be unenforceable.

(3) The amendments made to this section by Senate Bill 118 of the 2021–22 Regular Session shall apply retroactively to any decision related to enrollment or changes
 in enrollment made before the effective date of that bill.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 10, Sec. 1.   (SB 118)   Effective March 14, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.091.

The University of California and the California State University are not required to conduct a “no project” alternative analysis described in subdivision (e) of Section 15126.6 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations in an environmental impact report, a supplemental environmental impact report, or an addendum for a development project, for which the University of California or the California State University, respectively, is the lead agency, if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The lead agency finds that the development project is necessary to achieve the campus’ share of the enrollment goals set forth in Section 66002 of the Education Code. 

(b) The University of California or the California State University, respectively, has provided the forecast of changes in enrollment levels for purposes of developing the most recent proposed methodology that allocates regional housing needs pursuant to paragraph (9) of subdivision (e) of Section 65584.04 of the Government Code.

(c) One of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) The development project is consistent with Section 67504 of the Education Code and Section 21080.09 of this code.

(2) The development project is deemed by the applicable transportation planning agency designated under Sections 29532 and 29532.1 of the Government Code as consistent
 with the use designation, density, building intensity, and applicable policies specified for the area of the
 development project in either a sustainable communities strategy or an alternative planning strategy, for which the State Air Resources Board has accepted the metropolitan planning organization’s determination that the strategy would, if implemented, achieve the greenhouse gas emission reduction targets established by the State Air Resources Board, pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (J) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 65080 of the Government Code. The written determination that the project is consistent shall be submitted by the metropolitan planning organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 517, Sec. 5.   (SB 486)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.1.

(a) The lead agency shall be responsible for determining whether the project is exempt from this division and whether an environmental impact report, a negative declaration, or a mitigated negative declaration shall be required for any project that is subject to this division. That determination shall be final and conclusive on all persons, including responsible agencies, unless challenged as provided in Section 21167.

(b) (1) If a proposed housing development project would otherwise be exempt from this division pursuant to a statutory exemption, or categorical exemption pursuant to Class 1 to 5, inclusive, 12, 15, 20, 27, 30, or 32 that is adopted before January 1, 2026, but for a single condition detailed in the statutory exemption or
 in Section 15300.2, 15301, 15302, 15303, 15304, 15305, 15312, 15315, 15320, 15322, 15327, 15330, or 15332 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, as applicable, the application of this division to the approval of the proposed housing development project shall be limited to effects upon the environment that are caused solely by that single condition.

(2) An initial study or environmental impact report prepared for a housing development project subject to this subdivision is only required to examine those effects that the lead agency determines, based upon substantial evidence in the record, are caused solely by the single condition that makes the proposed housing development project ineligible for the statutory exemption or categorical exemption.

(3) An environmental impact report for a housing development project subject to this subdivision is not required to include
 any discussion of alternatives to the housing development project or the growth-inducing impacts of the housing development project.

(4) This subdivision does not apply to any of the following housing development projects:

(A) A proposed housing development project that is not similar in kind to the projects listed in the statutory or categorical exemption.

(B) A proposed housing development project that is ineligible for the statutory exemption or categorical exemption due to two or more conditions.

(C) A proposed housing development project that includes a distribution center or oil and gas infrastructure.

(D) (i) A proposed housing development project located on
 natural and protected lands, as defined pursuant to Section 21067.5.

(ii) The definition of “natural and protected lands” described in clause (i) does not include the lands described in subdivision (o) of Section 21067.5.

(E) The project site or the parcel size exceeds four acres, and either of the following occurred:

(i) The project is a builder’s remedy project, as defined in paragraph (11) of subdivision (h) of Section 65589.5 of the Government Code.

(ii) The project applicant applied pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (d) of Section 65589.5 of the Government Code as it read before January 1, 2025.

(5) For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions apply:

(A) “Condition” means a physical or regulatory feature of the project or its setting or an effect upon the environment caused by the project.

(B) “Housing development project” has the same meaning as defined in Section 65589.5 of the Government Code.

(c) In the case of a project described in subdivision (c) of Section 21065, the lead agency shall, upon the request of a potential applicant, provide for consultation before the filing of the application regarding the range of actions, potential
 alternatives, mitigation measures, and any potential and significant effects on the environment of the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 650, Sec. 7.   (SB 158)   Effective October 11, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.2.

In the case of a project described in subdivision (c) of Section 21065, the determination required by Section 21080.1 shall be made within 30 days from the date on which an application for a project has been received and accepted as complete by the lead agency. This period may be extended 15 days upon the consent of the lead agency and the project applicant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 586, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.3.

(a) Prior to determining whether a negative declaration or environmental impact report is required for a project, the lead agency shall consult with all responsible agencies and trustee agencies. Prior to that required consultation, the lead agency may informally contact any of those agencies.

(b) In order to expedite the requirements of subdivision (a), the Office of Planning and Research, upon request of a lead agency, shall assist the lead agency in determining the various responsible agencies and trustee agencies, for a proposed project. In the case of a project described in subdivision (c) of Section 21065, the request may also be made by the project applicant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 744, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.3.1.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that California Native American tribes traditionally and culturally affiliated with a geographic area may have expertise concerning their tribal cultural resources.

(b) Prior to the release of a negative declaration, mitigated negative declaration, or environmental impact report for a project, the lead agency shall begin consultation with a California Native American tribe that is traditionally and culturally affiliated with the geographic area of the proposed project if: (1) the California Native American tribe requested to the lead agency, in writing, to be informed by the lead agency through formal notification of proposed projects in the geographic area that
 is traditionally and culturally affiliated with the tribe, and (2) the California Native American tribe responds, in writing, within 30 days of receipt of the formal notification, and requests the consultation. When responding to the lead agency, the California Native American tribe shall designate a lead contact person. If the California Native American tribe does not designate a lead contact person, or designates multiple lead contact people, the lead agency shall defer to the individual listed on the contact list maintained by the Native American Heritage Commission for the purposes of Chapter 905 of the Statutes of 2004. For purposes of this section and Section 21080.3.2, “consultation” shall have the same meaning as provided in Section 65352.4 of the Government Code.

(c) To expedite the requirements of this section, the Native American Heritage Commission shall assist the lead agency in identifying the California Native American tribes
 that are traditionally and culturally affiliated with the project area.

(d) Within 14 days of determining that an application for a project is complete or a decision by a public agency to undertake a project, the lead agency shall provide formal notification to the designated contact of, or a tribal representative of, traditionally and culturally affiliated California Native American tribes that have requested notice, which shall be accomplished by means of at least one written notification that includes a brief description of the proposed project and its location, the lead agency contact information, and a notification that the California Native American tribe has 30 days to request consultation pursuant to this section.

(e) The lead agency shall begin the consultation process within 30 days of receiving a California Native American tribe’s request for
 consultation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 532, Sec. 5.   (AB 52)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.3.2.

(a) As a part of the consultation pursuant to Section 21080.3.1, the parties may propose mitigation measures, including, but not limited to, those recommended in Section 21084.3, capable of avoiding or substantially lessening potential significant impacts to a tribal cultural resource or alternatives that would avoid significant impacts to a tribal cultural resource. If the California Native American tribe requests consultation regarding alternatives to the project, recommended mitigation measures, or significant effects, the consultation shall include those topics. The consultation may include discussion concerning the type of environmental review necessary, the significance of tribal cultural resources, the significance of the project’s impacts on the tribal
 cultural resources, and, if necessary, project alternatives or the appropriate measures for preservation or mitigation that the California Native American tribe may recommended to the lead agency.

(b) The consultation shall be considered concluded when either of the following occurs:

(1) The parties agree to measures to mitigate or avoid a significant effect, if a significant effect exists, on a tribal cultural resource.

(2) A party, acting in good faith and after reasonable effort, concludes that mutual agreement cannot be reached.

(c) (1) This section does not limit the ability of a California Native American tribe or the public to submit information to the lead agency regarding the significance of the tribal cultural resources,
 the significance of the project’s impact on tribal cultural resources, or any appropriate measures to mitigate the impact.

(2) This section does not limit the ability of the lead agency or project proponent to incorporate changes and additions to the project as a result of the consultation, even if not legally required.

(d) If the project proponent or its consultants participate in the consultation, those parties shall respect the principles set forth in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 532, Sec. 6.   (AB 52)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.4.

(a) If a lead agency determines that an environmental impact report is required for a project, the lead agency shall immediately send notice of that determination by certified mail, email, or an equivalent procedure to each responsible agency, the Office of Planning and Research, and those public agencies having jurisdiction by law over natural resources affected by the project that are held in trust for the people of the State of California. Upon receipt of the notice, each responsible agency, the office, and each public agency having jurisdiction by law over natural resources affected by the project that are held in trust for the people of the State of California shall specify to the lead agency the scope and content of the environmental information that is germane to the statutory
 responsibilities of that responsible agency, the office, or the public agency in connection with the proposed project and which, pursuant to the requirements of this division, shall be included in the environmental impact report. The information shall be specified in writing and shall be communicated to the lead agency by certified mail, email, or an equivalent procedure not later than 30 days after the date of receipt of the notice of the lead agency’s determination. The lead agency shall request similar guidance from appropriate federal agencies.

(b) To expedite the requirements of subdivision (a), the lead agency, any responsible agency, the Office of Planning and Research, or a public agency having jurisdiction by law over natural resources affected by the project that are held in trust for the people of the State of California, may request one or more meetings between representatives of those agencies and the office for the purpose of
 assisting the lead agency to determine the scope and content of the environmental information that any of those responsible agencies, the office, or the public agencies may require. In the case of a project described in subdivision (c) of Section 21065, the request may also be made by the project applicant. The meetings shall be convened by the lead agency as soon as possible, but not later than 30 days after the date that the meeting was requested.

(c) To expedite the requirements of subdivision (a), the Office of Planning and Research, upon request of a lead agency, shall assist the lead agency in determining the various responsible agencies, public agencies having jurisdiction by law over natural resources affected by the project that are held in trust for the people of the State of California, and any federal agencies that have responsibility for carrying out or approving a proposed project. In the case of a project described in subdivision
 (c) of Section 21065, that request may also be made by the project applicant.

(d) With respect to the Department of Transportation, and with respect to any state agency that is a responsible agency or a public agency having jurisdiction by law over natural resources affected by the project that are held in trust for the people of the State of California, subject to the requirements of subdivision (a), the Office of Planning and Research shall ensure that the information required by subdivision (a) is transmitted to the lead agency, and that affected agencies are notified regarding meetings to be held upon request pursuant to subdivision (b), within the required time period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 97, Sec. 1.   (AB 819)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.5.

(a) Except as provided in Section 21158.1, when the regulatory program of a state agency requires a plan or other written documentation containing environmental information and complying with paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) to be submitted in support of an activity listed in subdivision (b), the plan or other written documentation may be submitted in lieu of the environmental impact report required by this division if the Secretary of the Resources Agency has certified the regulatory program pursuant to this section.

(b) This section applies only to regulatory programs or portions thereof that involve either of the following:

(1) The issuance to a person of a lease, permit, license, certificate, or
 other entitlement for use.

(2) The adoption or approval of standards, rules, regulations, or plans for use in the regulatory program.

(c) A regulatory program certified pursuant to this section is exempt from Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 21100), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 21150), and Section 21167, except as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 21157) of Chapter 4.5.

(d) To qualify for certification pursuant to this section, a regulatory program shall require the utilization of an interdisciplinary approach that will ensure the integrated use of the natural and social sciences in decisionmaking and that shall meet all of the following criteria:

(1) The enabling legislation of the regulatory program does both of the following:

(A) Includes protection of the environment among its principal purposes.

(B) Contains authority for the administering agency to adopt rules and regulations for the protection of the environment, guided by standards set forth in the enabling legislation.

(2) The rules and regulations adopted by the administering agency for the regulatory program do all of the following:

(A) Require that an activity will not be approved or adopted as proposed if there are feasible alternatives or feasible mitigation measures available that would substantially lessen a significant adverse effect that the activity may have on the environment.

(B) Include guidelines for the orderly evaluation of proposed
 activities and the preparation of the plan or other written documentation in a manner consistent with the environmental protection purposes of the regulatory program.

(C) Require the administering agency to consult with all public agencies that have jurisdiction, by law, with respect to the proposed activity.

(D) Require that final action on the proposed activity include the written responses of the issuing authority to significant environmental points raised during the evaluation process.

(E) Require the filing of a notice of the decision by the administering agency on the proposed activity with the Secretary of the Resources Agency. Those notices shall be available for public inspection, and a list of the notices shall be posted on a weekly basis in the Office of the Resources Agency. Each list shall remain posted
 for a period of 30 days.

(F) Require notice of the filing of the plan or other written documentation to be made to the public and to a person who requests, in writing, notification. The notification shall be made in a manner that will provide the public or a person requesting notification with sufficient time to review and comment on the filing.

(3) The plan or other written documentation required by the regulatory program does both of the following:

(A) Includes a description of the proposed activity with alternatives to the activity, and mitigation measures to minimize any significant adverse effect on the environment of the activity.

(B) Is available for a reasonable time for review and comment by other public agencies and the general public.

(e) (1) The Secretary of the Resources Agency shall certify a regulatory program that the secretary determines meets all the qualifications for certification set forth in this section, and withdraw certification on determination that the regulatory program has been altered so that it no longer meets those qualifications. Certification and withdrawal of certification shall occur only after compliance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) In determining whether or not a regulatory program meets the qualifications for certification set forth in this section, the inquiry of the secretary shall extend only to the question of whether the regulatory program meets the generic requirements of subdivision (d). The inquiry may not extend to individual decisions to be reached under the regulatory
 program, including the nature of specific alternatives or mitigation measures that might be proposed to lessen any significant adverse effect on the environment of the activity.

(3) If the secretary determines that the regulatory program submitted for certification does not meet the qualifications for certification set forth in this section, the secretary shall adopt findings setting forth the reasons for the determination.

(f) After a regulatory program has been certified pursuant to this section, a proposed change in the program that could affect compliance with the qualifications for certification specified in subdivision (d) may be submitted to the Secretary of the Resources Agency for review and comment. The scope of the secretary’s review shall extend only to the question of whether the regulatory program meets the generic requirements of subdivision (d). The review may not
 extend to individual decisions to be reached under the regulatory program, including specific alternatives or mitigation measures that might be proposed to lessen any significant adverse effect on the environment of the activity. The secretary shall have 30 days from the date of receipt of the proposed change to notify the state agency whether the proposed change will alter the regulatory program so that it no longer meets the qualification for certification established in this section and will result in a withdrawal of certification as provided in this section.

(g) An action or proceeding to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul a determination or decision of a state agency approving or adopting a proposed activity under a regulatory program that has been certified pursuant to this section on the basis that the plan or other written documentation prepared pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) does not comply with this section shall
 be commenced not later than 30 days from the date of the filing of notice of the approval or adoption of the activity.

(h) (1) An action or proceeding to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul a determination of the Secretary of the Resources Agency to certify a regulatory program pursuant to this section on the basis that the regulatory program does not comply with this section shall be commenced within 30 days from the date of certification by the secretary.

(2) In an action brought pursuant to paragraph (1), the inquiry shall extend only to whether there was a prejudicial abuse of discretion by the secretary. Abuse of discretion is established if the secretary has not proceeded in a manner required by law or if the determination is not supported by substantial evidence.

(i) For purposes of
 this section, a county agricultural commissioner is a state agency.

(j) For purposes of this section, an air quality management district or air pollution control district is a state agency, except that the approval, if any, by a district of a nonattainment area plan is subject to this section only if, and to the extent that, the approval adopts or amends rules or regulations.

(k) (1) The secretary, by July 1, 2004, shall develop a protocol for reviewing the prospective application of certified regulatory programs to evaluate the consistency of those programs with the requirements of this division. Following the completion of the development of the protocol, the secretary shall provide a report to the Senate Committee on Environmental Quality and the Assembly Committee on Natural Resources regarding the need for a grant of additional statutory authority
 authorizing the secretary to undertake a review of the certified regulatory programs.

(2) The secretary may update the protocol, and may update the report provided to the legislative committees pursuant to paragraph (1) and provide, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, the updated report to those committees if additional statutory authority is needed.

(3) The secretary shall provide a significant opportunity for public participation in developing or updating the protocol described in paragraph (1) or (2), including, but not limited to, at least two public meetings with interested parties. A notice of each meeting shall be provided at least 10 days prior to the meeting to a person who files a written request for a notice with the agency and to the Senate Committee on Environmental Quality and the Assembly Committee on Natural
 Resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 174.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.8.

This division does not apply to the conversion of an existing rental mobilehome park to a resident initiated subdivision, cooperative, or condominium for mobilehomes if the conversion will not result in an expansion of or change in existing use of the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 272, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.9.

This division shall not apply to activities and approvals by any local government, as defined in Section 30109, or any state university or college, as defined in Section 30119, as necessary for the preparation and adoption of a local coastal program or long-range land use development plan pursuant to Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000); provided, however, that certification of a local coastal program or long-range land use development plan by the California Coastal Commission pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 30500) of Division 20 shall be subject to the requirements of this division. For the purpose of Section 21080.5, a certified local coastal program or long-range land use development plan constitutes a plan for use in the California Coastal Commission’s regulatory program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 961.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.10.

This division does not apply to any of the following:

(a) An extension of time, granted pursuant to Section 65361 of the Government Code, for the preparation and adoption of one or more elements of a city or county general plan.

(b) Actions taken by the Department of Housing and Community Development, the California Housing Finance Agency, or a local agency not acting as the lead agency to provide financial assistance or insurance for the development and construction of residential housing for persons and families of low or moderate income, as defined in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code, if the project that is the subject of the application for financial assistance or insurance will be reviewed pursuant to
 this division by another public agency.

(c) (1) Actions taken by a local agency to approve a contract for providing services for people experiencing homelessness.

(2) The services described in paragraph (1) may include, but are not limited to, case management, resource navigation, security services, residential services, and counseling services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 188, Sec. 1.   (SB 1361)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.11.

This division shall not apply to settlements of title and boundary problems by the State Lands Commission and to exchanges or leases in connection with those settlements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1463, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.12.

(a) This division does not apply to actions of the Office of Planning and Research and its subsidiary entities to provide financial assistance for planning, research, or project implementation related to land use or climate resiliency, adaptation, or mitigation if the project that is the subject of the application for financial assistance will be reviewed by another public agency pursuant to this division or by a tribe pursuant to an alternative process or program the tribe implements for evaluating environmental impacts.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that the exemption set forth in subdivision (a) is appropriate due to the unique role that the Office of Planning and Research plays in the administration of this
 division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 45, Sec. 45.   (AB 127)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.13.

(a) This division shall not apply to any railroad grade separation project that eliminates an existing grade crossing or that reconstructs an existing grade separation.

(b) (1) Whenever a state agency determines that a project is not subject to this division pursuant to this section, and it approves or determines to carry out the project, the state agency shall file a notice with the Office of Planning and Research in the manner specified in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 21108.

(2) Whenever a local agency determines that a project is not subject to this division pursuant to this section,